Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.734

Washington/Oregon reciprocity tuition and fee program—Implementation agreement.

The governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College, and the state board for community and technical colleges may enter into an agreement with appropriate officials or agencies in Oregon to implement the provisions of RCW 28B.15.730 through 28B.15.734.

[ 2012 c 229 s 705; 1985 c 370 s 71; 1979 c 80 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Severability—1979 c 80: See note following RCW 28B.15.730.